Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2622.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Firefighter Adam E. Cole Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Adam E. Cole was born May 25, 1983, in Gettysburg.(2) Mr. Cole was a 2002 graduate of Biglerville High School.(3) Mr. Cole was a member of Apple City Future Farmers of America where he earned several degrees and awards, including the Greenhand Degree, Star Greenhand, Chapter Degree, Apple Degree, Keystone Degree, American Degree, PA State Star in Horticulture, Dekalb Award and the South Mountain Antique Engine Association Agriculture Award. Mr. Cole was also the Future Farmers of America Vice President 12345678910111213141516171819 for two years and Chaplain for one year.(4) Mr. Cole was employed by Cole Brothers Tree Farm in Biglerville and was a certified emergency medical technician. He also served as a volunteer firefighter at Buchanan Valley Fire Company.(5) Outside of work, Mr. Cole enjoyed spending time with his family, including his parents; his sister, Meagan R. Cole; his brother, Brock D. Cole; maternal grandparents, Howard and Colleen Fleshman of New Chester; and his dear friend, Amanda Golden. Mr. Cole was an avid sportsman and a dedicated Washington Redskins fan, NASCAR enthusiast and member of the Buchanan Valley Rod and Gun Club where he served as Activities Reporter. He was also a member of St. Ignatius Catholic Church, Orrtanna.(6) Adam E. Cole passed away on October 4, 2007, from injuries received in an automobile accident while responding to a fire call.(b) Designation.--The bridge, identified as Bridge Key 53749, carrying Pennsylvania Route 234 over the Conewago Creek in Franklin Township, Adams County, is designated as the Firefighter Adam E. Cole Memorial Bridge.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2622PN3577 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526